Illinois, session 104th, HB2899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 2-13 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 120/2-13 new)7    Sec. 2-13. Remote Retailer Amnesty Program.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Eligibility period" means the period from January 1, 2021 10through June 30, 2026.11    "Eligible transaction" means the sale of tangible personal 12property by a remote retailer to an Illinois customer that 13occurs during the eligibility period and that requires the 14remote retailer to ship or otherwise deliver the tangible 15personal property to an address in the State. 16    "Local retailers' occupation tax" means a retailers' 17occupation tax imposed by a municipality, county, or other 18unit of local government and administered by the Department.19    "Program" means the Remote Retailer Amnesty Program 20established under this Section. 21    "Remote retailer" means a remote retailer, as defined in 22Section 1 of this Act, who has met a tax remittance threshold 23under subsection (b) of Section 2 of this Act for all or part   HB2899- 2 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1of the eligibility period and who is participating in the 2Program established under this Section.3    "Remote retailer amnesty period" means the period from 4August 1, 2026 through October 31, 2026, during which the 5Department will accept returns and payment of State and local 6retailers' occupation taxes at the simplified retailers' 7occupation tax rate for eligible transactions that occur 8during the eligibility period.9    "Simplified retailers' occupation tax rate" means the 10combined State and average local retailers' occupation tax 11rate imposed on remote retailers participating in the Program. 12The simplified retailers' occupation tax rate shall be (i) 9% 13of the gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property 14that are subject to the 6.25% State rate of tax imposed by 15Section 2-10 of this Act or (ii) 1.75% of the gross receipts 16from sales of tangible personal property that are subject to 17the 1% State rate of tax imposed by Section 2-10 of this Act.18    "Taxing jurisdiction" means a municipality, county, or 19other unit of local government that imposes a local retailers' 20occupation tax.21    (b) The Department shall establish a Remote Retailer 22Amnesty Program for remote retailers that owe State or local 23retailers' occupation taxes on eligible transactions. The 24Program shall operate during the remote retailer amnesty 25period.26    The Program shall allow a remote retailer who participates   HB2899- 3 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1in the Program to report and remit, at the simplified 2retailers' occupation tax rate, State and local retailers' 3occupation taxes that are due in connection with eligible 4transactions. The payment shall be made by the remote retailer 5during the remote retailer amnesty period and shall be in lieu 6of reporting and remitting State and local retailers' 7occupation taxes at the rate otherwise provided by law. The 8payment of the tax at the simplified retailers' occupation tax 9rate relieves the remote retailer of any additional State or 10local retailers' occupation taxes with respect to the eligible 11transaction.12    The Program shall provide that, if the remote retailer 13satisfies its State and local retailers' occupation tax 14liability during the remote retailer amnesty period by 15reporting and remitting payment to the Department at the 16simplified retailers' occupation tax rate, the Department 17shall abate and not seek to collect any interest or penalties 18that may be applicable with respect to those eligible 19transactions, and the Department shall not seek civil or 20criminal prosecution of the remote retailer for the period of 21time for which amnesty has been granted to the retailer. The 22remote retailer must make full payment of all State and local 23retailers' occupation taxes due with respect to the remote 24retailer's eligible transactions, using the simplified 25retailers' occupation tax rate, during the remote retailer 26amnesty period for amnesty to be granted, unless the remote   HB2899- 4 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1retailer enters into an approved repayment plan with the 2Department during the remote retailer amnesty period. In that 3case, amnesty shall be granted upon successful completion of 4the repayment plan as long as the taxpayer remains in 5compliance with the terms of the payment plan throughout its 6duration. Failure to pay all taxes due using the simplified 7retailers' occupation tax rate for the eligible period, unless 8tax has previously been remitted using the applicable State 9and local retailers' occupation tax rates, shall invalidate 10any amnesty granted under this Act, and all retailers' 11occupation tax due for the eligible period shall be due at the 12applicable State and local rate for the particular selling 13location.14    (c) Amnesty shall be granted only if all amnesty 15conditions are satisfied by the taxpayer. The amnesty provided 16by this Section shall be granted to any remote retailer who, 17during the remote retailer amnesty period, files all returns 18and remits all State and local retailers' occupation tax on 19all eligible transactions using the simplified retailers' 20occupation tax rate or otherwise applicable State and local 21retailers' occupation tax rates due for all of the remote 22retailer's eligible transactions. In addition, the following 23requirements apply to the Program:24        (1) to participate in the Program, the remote 25    retailers must be registered with the Department as set 26    out in Section 2a of this Act;  HB2899- 5 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1        (2) returns filed under the Program shall be filed 2    electronically in the manner prescribed by the Department 3    in Section 3 of this Act and shall be filed only during the 4    remote retailer amnesty period;5        (3) the remote retailer shall remit the tax at the 6    simplified retailers' occupation tax rate or, if the tax 7    was collected, in the amount of the tax collected, 8    whichever is greater; the required reporting for each 9    return period from the remote retailer shall include only 10    statewide totals of the retailers' occupation taxes 11    remitted at the simplified retailers' occupation tax rate 12    and shall not require information related to the location 13    of purchasers or amount of sales into a specific taxing 14    jurisdiction;15        (4) amnesty is not available for any retailers' 16    occupation tax remitted to the Department prior to the 17    remote retailer amnesty program period by the remote 18    retailer;19        (5) amnesty shall not be granted to taxpayers who are 20    a party to any criminal investigation or to any civil or 21    criminal litigation that is pending in any circuit court, 22    any appellate court, or the Supreme Court of this State 23    for nonpayment, delinquency, or fraud in relation to any 24    State tax imposed by any law of the State of Illinois;25        (6) amnesty shall not be granted to taxpayers who 26    commit fraud or intentional misrepresentation of a   HB2899- 6 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1    material fact in any document filed under the Remote 2    Retailer Amnesty Program; and3        (7) amnesty is applicable only to retailers' 4    occupation taxes due from the remote retailer in his or 5    her capacity as a remote retailer and not to any other 6    taxes that may be owed by the remote retailer pursuant to 7    another tax Act.8    (d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of 9subsection (c), no remote retailer shall be required to remit 10the tax at a rate greater than 9% or 1.75%, as applicable, 11regardless of the combined actual tax rates that may otherwise 12be applicable. Additionally, no gross receipts for which State 13and local retailers' occupation tax is remitted at the 14simplified retailers' occupation tax rate shall be subject to 15any additional retailers' occupation tax from any taxing 16jurisdiction imposing a retailers' occupation tax with respect 17to the sale of the property, regardless of the actual tax rate 18that might have otherwise been applicable.19    (e) The remote retailer shall remit the State and local 20retailers' occupation tax at the simplified rate on all gross 21receipts from sales of tangible personal property into 22Illinois unless the remote retailer can produce a valid 23exemption number or certificate, resale certificate, or direct 24pay permit issued by the Department. The remote retailer shall 25retain all exemption numbers or certificates, resale 26certificates, or direct pay permits in its books and records,   HB2899- 7 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1or in such other manner as directed by the Department.2    (f) Remote retailers shall maintain records of all 3eligible transactions, including copies of invoices showing 4the purchaser, the purchase amount, the taxes collected, and 5the retailers' occupation tax remitted. Records must be kept 6documenting all tangible personal property sold for which the 71.75% simplified retailers' occupation tax rate is used to 8verify that the tangible personal property qualifies for the 91% State tax rate imposed under Section 2-10 of this Act. Those 10records shall be made available for review and inspection upon 11request by the Department. Remote retailers participating in 12the Program remain subject to audit by the Department as 13provided in this Act. Remote retailers participating in the 14Program shall not be subject to audit or review by any unit of 15local government under the Local Government Revenue Recapture 16Act.17    (g) The net revenue realized at the 9% rate under this 18Section shall be deposited as follows: (i) notwithstanding the 19provisions of Section 3 of the Retailer's Occupation Tax Act 20to the contrary, the net revenue realized from the portion of 21the rate in excess of 5% shall be deposited into the State and 22Local Sales Tax Reform Fund and (ii) the net revenue realized 23from the 5% portion of the rate shall be deposited as provided 24in this Section 3 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act for the 255% portion of the 6.25% general rate imposed under this Act. 26The net revenue realized at the 1.75% rate under this Section   HB2899- 8 -LRB104 03442 HLH 19884 b1shall be deposited into the State and Local Sales Tax Reform 2Fund.3    (h) The Department may adopt rules related to the 4implementation, administration, and participation in the 5Program. The Department shall have exclusive responsibility 6for reviewing and accepting applications for participation and 7for the administration, return processing, and review of the 8eligibility of remote retailers participating in the Program.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.